Massachusetts, session 194th, H5457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. There is hereby imposed a real estate transfer fee equal to 0.5% (one half
percent) of the purchase price upon the transfer of any real property interest in any real property
situated in the Town of Provincetown with a purchase price of $1,000,000 or greater. Said fee
shall be the liability of the purchaser of such property interest, and any agreement between the
purchaser and the seller or any other person with reference to the allocation of the responsibility
for bearing said fee shall not affect such liability of the seller. The fee shall be paid to the Town
of Provincetown. The funds collected in each fiscal year shall be deposited equally in both the
Town’s Year Round Market Rate Rental Housing Trust and the Provincetown’s Affordable
Housing Trust.
Section 2. The following transfers of real property interests shall be exempt from the real
estate transfer fee:
of 3

A. First time homebuyers who live in the home for at least 5 years. A lien shall
accompany the deed stating that “There is running with the land a lien equal to the amount of fee
exempted, plus accumulated interest and penalties until such time as all conditions of this sub-
section are met.”
B. Transfers to the government of the U.S., the Commonwealth, the Town of
Provincetown and any of their instrumentalities, agencies or sub-divisions, such as the
Provincetown Housing Authority.
C. Transfers made without additional consideration to confirm, correct, modify or
supplement a transfer previously made.
D. Transfers of convenience with consideration under $100 which include: name change,
into trusts, out of trust, etc.
E. Transfers to any charitable organization as defined in Clause 3 of Section 5 of Chapter
59 of the General Laws or any religious organization providing that the real property interests so
transferred will be held solely for public charitable or religious purposes.
F. Transfers between family members, marriage partners, parents and children,
grandchildren, stepparents and stepchildren, brothers and sisters.
G. Transfers of any unit covered by a year round housing deed restriction.
Section 3.
A. The fee imposed shall be due at the time of the transfer of the real property interest.
of 3

B. The buyer shall pay interest on any unpaid amount of the fee at the rate the Town
collects on unpaid real estate taxes.
C. The Town shall notify a buyer by registered or certified mail of any failure to
discharge the amount in full of fee due.
D. All fees and interest required to be paid under this Act shall constitute a personal debt
of the buyer and may be recovered in an action of contract.
Section 4. This Act shall take effect on passage.
of 3